New Mexico, session 2026, HB1.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO:
SECTION 1. SESSION EXPENSES.--
A. There is appropriated from the general fund for
the expense of the legislative department of the state of New
Mexico for the second session of the fifty-seventh
legislature for per diem and mileage of its members, for
salaries of employees and for other expenses of the
legislature, seven million two hundred forty-one thousand
four hundred dollars ($7,241,400) or so much thereof as may
be necessary for such purposes.
B. The expenditures referred to in Subsection A of
this section are as follows:
(1) per diem for senators . . . . $254,600;
(2) per diem for members of the house of
representatives . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $424,200; HB 1/ec
Page 1

(3) mileage traveled by members of the
senate going to and returning from the seat of government by
the usually traveled route, one round trip. . . . . . $8,000;
(4) mileage traveled by members of the house
of representatives going to and returning from the seat of
government by the usually traveled route, one round trip. . .
. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,500;
(5) salaries and employee benefits of senate
employees . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,700,000;
(6) salaries and employee benefits of house
of representatives employees. . . . . . . . . . . $2,275,000;
(7) for expense of the senate not itemized
above, five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000). No part of
this item may be transferred to salaries or employee
benefits;
(8) for expense of the house of
representatives not itemized above, four hundred sixty-six
thousand one hundred dollars ($466,100). No part of this
item may be transferred to salaries or employee benefits; and
(9) for session expenses of the legislative
council service, the joint billroom and mailroom and joint
legislative switchboard, one million six hundred thousand
dollars ($1,600,000) to be disbursed upon vouchers signed by
the director of the legislative council service or the
director's designee. HB 1/ec
Page 2

C. The expenditures for the senate shall be
disbursed on vouchers signed by the chair of the committees'
committee and the chief clerk of the senate or the chief
clerk's designee. The expenditures for the house of
representatives shall be disbursed on vouchers signed by the
speaker and chief clerk of the house or the chief clerk's
designee. Following adjournment of the session, expenditures
authorized pursuant to Paragraphs (1) through (8) of
Subsection B of this section shall be disbursed upon vouchers
signed by the director of the legislative council service or
the director's designee.
D. Under the printing contracts entered into for
the second session of the fifty-seventh legislature, the
chair of the committees' committee of the senate, subject to
the approval of the committee, and the speaker of the house
of representatives are authorized and directed to provide for
the printing of all bills, resolutions, joint resolutions,
memorials and joint memorials introduced in the senate or
house, the printing of the bill locator and the printing of
all necessary stationery required for use in the respective
houses. They are further directed to provide for the
purchase of all supplies necessary for use in the respective
houses within the appropriation provided. The orders for
printing, stationery and supplies shall be approved by the
chair of the committees' committee in the senate or by the HB 1/ec
Page 3

speaker of the house.
SECTION 2. BILLS AND OTHER PRINTED MATERIALS.--For the
second session of the fifty-seventh legislature, bills,
resolutions, joint resolutions, memorials and joint memorials
delivered to the printer shall be returned by the printer to
the joint billroom within forty-two hours after they are
ordered to be printed. The billroom personnel shall supply a
complete file of bills, resolutions, joint resolutions,
memorials, joint memorials and other printed distribution
materials to the following:
A. upon request, one copy to each member of the
house of representatives and the senate;
B. upon written request, one copy to each county
clerk, district judge, radio or television station and
newspaper and to the general library of each state-supported
institution of higher learning; and
C. upon written request, one copy to each state
department, commission, board, institution or agency, each
elected state official, each incorporated municipality, each
district attorney, each ex-governor, each member of the New
Mexico congressional delegation and each school district in
the state.
SECTION 3. LEGISLATIVE COUNCIL SERVICE.--There is
appropriated from the general fund to the legislative council
service for expenditure in fiscal year 2027, to be disbursed HB 1/ec
Page 4

upon vouchers signed by the director of the legislative
council service or the director's designee, the following:
Personal Services & Employee Benefits $10,916,300
Contractual Services $485,000
Other Costs $1,403,800
Total $12,805,100.
SECTION 4. LEGISLATURE.--There is appropriated from the
general fund, unless otherwise indicated, for the expense of
the legislative department, not provided for in Section 1 of
this act, for expenditure in fiscal year 2027, unless
otherwise indicated, to be disbursed on vouchers signed by
the director of the legislative council service or the
director's designee, the following:
A. for travel expenses of legislators other than
New Mexico legislative council members, on legislative
council business, for committee travel, staff and other
necessary expenses for other interim committees and for other
necessary legislative expenses, three million five hundred
thousand dollars ($3,500,000); provided that the New Mexico
legislative council may transfer amounts from the
appropriation in this subsection, during the fiscal years for
which appropriated, to any other legislative appropriation
where they may be needed;
B. for pre-session expenditures and for necessary
contracts, supplies and personnel for interim session HB 1/ec
Page 5

preparation, five hundred sixty thousand dollars ($560,000);
C. for a statewide legislative intern program,
sixty-one thousand eight hundred dollars ($61,800);
D. for dues and fees of national organizations of
which the legislature is a member, four hundred seventy-nine
thousand three hundred dollars ($479,300);
E. for the legislative information system, for
fiscal years 2026 and 2027, three million five hundred
twenty-nine thousand eight hundred dollars ($3,529,800);
F. for the interim duties of the senate rules
committee, thirty-five thousand dollars ($35,000);
G. for the contractual services of the capitol
buildings planning commission, two hundred fifty-seven
thousand five hundred dollars ($257,500);
H. for expenditure in fiscal years 2026 through
2028 for the planning, output development and design of an
integrated capital outlay data system, two million one
hundred thousand dollars ($2,100,000);
I. for legislative district staff, including
salaries and benefits, information technology equipment and
software, furniture, supplies, office space and other
necessary support, thirteen million two hundred thousand
dollars ($13,200,000). Any unexpended balance remaining at
the end of fiscal year 2027 from the appropriation in this
subsection shall revert to the general fund; HB 1/ec
Page 6

J. for expenditure in fiscal years 2027 through
2029 from legislative cash balances for equipment, furniture,
upgrades and repairs for the state capitol complex, two
million six hundred thousand dollars ($2,600,000); and
K. for expenditure in fiscal years 2026 and 2027
from legislative cash balances for the ongoing planning,
output development and design of a legislative processing
system, one million dollars ($1,000,000).
SECTION 5. LEGISLATIVE FINANCE COMMITTEE.--
A. There is appropriated from the general fund to
the legislative finance committee, to be disbursed upon
vouchers signed by the chair of the committee or the chair's
designated representative:
(1) for expenditure in fiscal year 2027, the
following:
Personal Services & Employee Benefits $6,980,700
Contractual Services $386,000
Other Costs $584,600
Total $7,951,300;
and
(2) for expenditure in fiscal years 2027 and
2028, one hundred seventy thousand dollars ($170,000) for
economic analysis subscription costs and data analysis
equipment.
B. Up to fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) of the HB 1/ec
Page 7

unexpended balance of the appropriation in Laws 2025 (2nd
S.S.), Chapter 1, Section 7 may be expended from any
category.
SECTION 6. LEGISLATIVE EDUCATION STUDY COMMITTEE.--
There is appropriated from the general fund to the
legislative education study committee for expenditure in
fiscal year 2027, to be disbursed on vouchers signed by the
chair of the committee or the chair's designated
representative, the following:
Personal Services & Employee Benefits $1,824,300
Contractual Services $40,000
Other Costs $160,000
Total $2,024,300.
SECTION 7. HOUSE CHIEF CLERK.--There is appropriated
from the general fund to the legislative council service for
expenditure in fiscal year 2027 for the operation of the
house chief clerk's office, to be disbursed on vouchers
signed by the director of the legislative council service,
the following:
Personal Services & Employee Benefits $3,716,700
Contractual Services $397,300
Other Costs $87,900
Total $4,201,900.
SECTION 8. SENATE CHIEF CLERK.--There is appropriated
from the general fund to the legislative council service for HB 1/ec
Page 8

expenditure in fiscal year 2027 for the operation of the
senate chief clerk's office, to be disbursed on vouchers
signed by the director of the legislative council service,
the following:
Personal Services & Employee Benefits $3,361,500
Contractual Services $467,600
Other Costs $120,900
Total $3,950,000.
SECTION 9. CENSUS REDISTRICTING DATA PROGRAM.--There is
appropriated from the legislative cash balances to the
legislative council service for the first and second phases
of the 2030 census redistricting data program and to perform
such functions as are necessary to prepare for redistricting
in 2031, five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) for
expenditure in fiscal years 2026 through 2028.
SECTION 10. OFFICIAL MASTER DATABASE OF LAWS--SELF-
PUBLICATION--FREE ACCESS TECHNOLOGY--HARD-COPY PUBLICATION.--
There is appropriated from the legislative cash balances for
the legislative department's share of the continued
development required for the master database of official
annotated laws of the state, markup language and tagging and
its use for legislative document systems and a tagged
database of the session laws and for the costs associated in
collaborating with the New Mexico compilation commission on
the ongoing development and expanding partnership role with HB 1/ec
Page 9

the New Mexico compilation commission in the self-publication
of the New Mexico Statutes Annotated 1978, including
technology for freely accessible laws and hard-copy
publication, four hundred thousand dollars ($400,000) for
expenditure during fiscal years 2026 and 2027.
SECTION 11. CATEGORY TRANSFER.--Amounts set out in
Sections 3 through 8 of this act are provided for
informational purposes only and may be transferred among
categories.
SECTION 12. PERFORMANCE MEASURES.--Each legislative
agency shall adhere to the performance measures specified in
its strategic plan and shall make reports as required in that
plan.
SECTION 13. EMERGENCY.--It is necessary for the public
peace, health and safety that this act take effect
immediately. HB 1/ec
Page 10